Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6306
License; term; renewal.

(1) A license of a business entity shall expire on the first anniversary of its effective date unless it is renewed for one year as provided in this section.

(2) At least thirty days before the license expires, the department shall send to the licensee at his or her last-known address a renewal notice which states:

(a) The date on which the current license expires;

(b) The date by which the renewal application must be received by the department for the renewal to be issued and mailed before the license expires; and

(c) The amount of the renewal fee.

(3) Before the license expires, the licensee may renew it for an additional one-year period if the licensee:

(a) Is otherwise entitled to be licensed;

(b) Submits a renewal application to the department in the form required by the department; and

(c) Pays the renewal fee prescribed by the department.

Laws 1986, LB 1051, § 6;

Laws 1988, LB 1073, § 6;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1247.